Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.100

Form of writ of garnishment. (Effective until July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5651-S2.SL) ***

(1) A writ issued for a continuing lien on earnings shall be substantially in the form provided in RCW 6.27.105. All other writs of garnishment shall be substantially in the following form, but:

(a) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for child support, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support";

(b) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for private student loan debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for private student loan debt";

(c) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for consumer debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for consumer debt"; and

(d) If the writ is issued by an attorney, the writ shall be revised as indicated in subsection (2) of this section:

"IN THE . . . . . COURT

OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR

THE COUNTY OF . . . . . .

. . . .,

Plaintiff,

No. . . . .

vs.

. . . .,

WRIT OF

Defendant,

GARNISHMENT

. . . .,

Garnishee

THE STATE OF WASHINGTON TO: . . . .

Garnishee

AND TO: . . . .

Defendant

The above-named plaintiff has applied for a writ of garnishment against you, claiming that the above-named defendant is indebted to plaintiff and that the amount to be held to satisfy that indebtedness is $ . . . . . ., consisting of:

Balance on Judgment or Amount of Claim

$ . . . .

Interest under Judgment from . . . . to . . . .

$ . . . .

Per Day Rate of Estimated Interest

$ . . . . per day

Taxable Costs and Attorneys' Fees

$ . . . .

Estimated Garnishment Costs:

Filing and Ex Parte Fees

$ . . . .

Service and Affidavit Fees

$ . . . .

Postage and Costs of Certified Mail

$ . . . .

Answer Fee or Fees

$ . . . .

Garnishment Attorney Fee

$ . . . .

Other

$ . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court, by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment, delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.

YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ according to the instructions in this writ and in the answer forms and, within twenty days after the service of the writ upon you, to mail or deliver the original of such answer to the court, one copy to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant, at the addresses listed at the bottom of this writ.

If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.

FOR ALL DEBTS EXCEPT PRIVATE STUDENT LOAN DEBT AND CONSUMER DEBT:

If you are a bank or other institution in which the defendant has accounts to which the exemption under RCW 6.15.010(1)(d)(iii)(A) applies and the total of the amounts held in all of the defendant's accounts is less than or equal to $500, release all funds or property to the defendant and do not hold any amount. However, if you have documentation that the funds in the account are the community property of married persons or domestic partners, and if the total of the amounts held in all of the combined accounts of the married persons or domestic partners is less than or equal to $1,000, then release all funds or property to the defendant and do not hold any amount.

If you are a bank or other institution in which the defendant has accounts to which the exemption under RCW 6.15.010(1)(d)(iii)(A) applies and the total of the amounts held in all of the defendant's accounts is in excess of $500, release at least $500, hold no more than the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ and any processing fee if one is charged, and release additional funds or property, if any, to the defendant. However, if you have documentation that the funds in the account are the community property of married persons or domestic partners, and if the total of the amounts held in all of the combined accounts of the married persons or domestic partners is in excess of $1,000, release at least $1,000, hold no more than the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ and any processing fee if one is charged, and release additional funds or property, if any, to the defendant.

FOR PRIVATE STUDENT LOAN DEBT AND CONSUMER DEBT:

If you are a bank or other institution in which the defendant has accounts to which the exemption under RCW 6.15.010(1)(d)(iii) (B) or (C) applies and the total of the amounts held in all of the defendant's accounts is less than or equal to $1,000, release all funds or property to the defendant and do not hold any amount. However, if you have documentation that the funds in the account are the community property of married persons or domestic partners, and if the total of the amounts held in all of the combined accounts of the married persons or domestic partners is less than or equal to $2,000, then release all funds or property to the defendant and do not hold any amount.

If you are a bank or other institution in which the defendant has accounts to which the exemption under RCW 6.15.010(1)(d)(iii) (B) or (C) applies and the total of the amounts held in all of the defendant's accounts is in excess of $1,000, release at least $1,000, hold no more than the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ and any processing fee if one is charged, and release additional funds or property, if any, to the defendant. However, if you have documentation that the funds in the account are the community property of married persons or domestic partners, and if the total of the amounts held in all of the combined accounts of the married persons or domestic partners is in excess of $2,000, release at least $2,000, hold no more than the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ and any processing fee if one is charged, and release additional funds or property, if any, to the defendant.

IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.

JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

[Seal]

. . . .

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff (or Plaintiff, if no attorney)

Clerk of the Court

. . . .

. . . .

Address

By

. . . .

. . . .

Name of Defendant

Address"

. . . .

Address of Defendant

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ issued by the clerk of the court.

Dated this . . . . . . . .day of . . . . . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address of the Clerk of the Court"

. . . .

Name of Defendant

. . . .

Address of Defendant

[ 2023 c 393 s 4; 2021 c 50 s 3; 2019 c 371 s 4; 2018 c 199 s 204; 2012 c 159 s 3; 2003 c 222 s 4; 2000 c 72 s 3; 1998 c 227 s 3; 1997 c 296 s 2; 1988 c 231 s 25; 1987 c 442 s 1010; 1981 c 193 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 11. Formerly RCW 7.33.110.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2023 c 393 ss 1 and 4: See note following RCW 6.15.010.

Findings—Intent—Expiration date—2021 c 50: See notes following RCW 6.15.010.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 199: See notes following RCW 67.08.100.

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

PDFRCW 6.27.100

Form of writ of garnishment. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5651-S2.SL) ***

(1) A writ issued for a continuing lien on earnings shall be substantially in the form provided in RCW 6.27.105. All other writs of garnishment shall be substantially in the following form, but:

(a) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for child support, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for child support";

(b) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for private student loan debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for private student loan debt";

(c) If the writ is issued under an order or judgment for consumer debt, the following statement shall appear conspicuously in the caption: "This garnishment is based on a judgment or order for consumer debt"; and

(d) If the writ is issued by an attorney, the writ shall be revised as indicated in subsection (2) of this section:

"IN THE . . . . . COURT

OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON IN AND FOR

THE COUNTY OF . . . . . .

. . . .,

Plaintiff,

No. . . . .

vs.

. . . .,

WRIT OF

Defendant,

GARNISHMENT

. . . .,

Garnishee

THE STATE OF WASHINGTON TO: . . . .

Garnishee

AND TO: . . . .

Defendant

The above-named plaintiff has applied for a writ of garnishment against you, claiming that the above-named defendant is indebted to plaintiff and that the amount to be held to satisfy that indebtedness is $ . . . . . ., consisting of:

Balance on Judgment or Amount of Claim

$ . . . .

Interest under Judgment from . . . . to . . . .

$ . . . .

Per Day Rate of Estimated Interest

$ . . . . per day

Taxable Costs and Attorneys' Fees

$ . . . .

Estimated Garnishment Costs:

Filing and Ex Parte Fees

$ . . . .

Service and Affidavit Fees

$ . . . .

Postage and Costs of Certified Mail

$ . . . .

Answer Fee or Fees

$ . . . .

Garnishment Attorney Fee

$ . . . .

Other

$ . . . .

YOU ARE HEREBY COMMANDED, unless otherwise directed by the court, by the attorney of record for the plaintiff, or by this writ, not to pay any debt, whether earnings subject to this garnishment or any other debt, owed to the defendant at the time this writ was served and not to deliver, sell, or transfer, or recognize any sale or transfer of, any personal property or effects of the defendant in your possession or control at the time when this writ was served. Any such payment, delivery, sale, or transfer is void to the extent necessary to satisfy the plaintiff's claim and costs for this writ with interest.

YOU ARE FURTHER COMMANDED to answer this writ according to the instructions in this writ and in the answer forms and, within twenty days after the service of the writ upon you, to mail or deliver the original of such answer to the court, one copy to the plaintiff or the plaintiff's attorney, and one copy to the defendant, at the addresses listed at the bottom of this writ.

If you owe the defendant a debt payable in money in excess of the amount set forth in the first paragraph of this writ, hold only the amount set forth in the first paragraph and any processing fee if one is charged and release all additional funds or property to defendant.

IF YOU FAIL TO ANSWER THIS WRIT AS COMMANDED, A JUDGMENT MAY BE ENTERED AGAINST YOU FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF THE PLAINTIFF'S CLAIM AGAINST THE DEFENDANT WITH ACCRUING INTEREST, ATTORNEY FEES, AND COSTS WHETHER OR NOT YOU OWE ANYTHING TO THE DEFENDANT. IF YOU PROPERLY ANSWER THIS WRIT, ANY JUDGMENT AGAINST YOU WILL NOT EXCEED THE AMOUNT OF ANY NONEXEMPT DEBT OR THE VALUE OF ANY NONEXEMPT PROPERTY OR EFFECTS IN YOUR POSSESSION OR CONTROL.

JUDGMENT MAY ALSO BE ENTERED AGAINST THE DEFENDANT FOR COSTS AND FEES INCURRED BY THE PLAINTIFF.

Witness, the Honorable . . . . . . . ., Judge of the above-entitled Court, and the seal thereof, this . . . . day of . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

[Seal]

. . . .

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff (or Plaintiff, if no attorney)

Clerk of the Court

. . . .

. . . .

Address

By

. . . .

. . . .

Name of Defendant

Address"

. . . .

Address of Defendant

(2) If an attorney issues the writ of garnishment, the final paragraph of the writ, containing the date, and the subscripted attorney and clerk provisions, shall be replaced with text in substantially the following form:

"This writ is issued by the undersigned attorney of record for plaintiff under the authority of chapter 6.27 of the Revised Code of Washington, and must be complied with in the same manner as a writ issued by the clerk of the court.

Dated this . . . . . . . .day of . . . . . . . . . ., . . . . (year)

. . . .

Attorney for Plaintiff

. . . .

. . . .

Address

Address of the Clerk of the Court"

. . . .

Name of Defendant

. . . .

Address of Defendant

[ 2019 c 371 s 4; 2018 c 199 s 204; 2012 c 159 s 3; 2003 c 222 s 4; 2000 c 72 s 3; 1998 c 227 s 3; 1997 c 296 s 2; 1988 c 231 s 25; 1987 c 442 s 1010; 1981 c 193 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 11. Formerly RCW 7.33.110.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 199: See notes following RCW 67.08.100.

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.